Washington statutes.
RCW 44.28.155

WorkFirst program evaluation.

(1) The joint legislative audit and review committee shall conduct an evaluation of the effectiveness of the WorkFirst program described in chapter 58, Laws of 1997, including the job opportunities and basic skills training program and any approved private, county, or local government WorkFirst program. The evaluation shall assess the success of the program in assisting clients to become employed and to reduce their use of temporary assistance for needy families. The study shall include but not be limited to the following:

(a) An assessment of employment outcomes, including hourly wages, hours worked, and total earnings, for clients;

(b) A comparison of temporary assistance for needy families outcomes, including grant amounts and program exits, for clients; and

(c) An audit of the performance-based contract for each private nonprofit contractor for job opportunities and basic skills training program services. The joint legislative audit and review committee may contract with the Washington institute for public policy for appropriate portions of the evaluation required by this section.

(2) Administrative data shall be provided by the department of social and health services, the employment security department, the state board for community and technical colleges, local governments, and private contractors. The department of social and health services shall require contractors to provide administrative and outcome data needed for this study as a condition of contract compliance.

[ 1997 c 58 s 705.]

NOTES:

Short title—Part headings, captions, table of contents not law—Exemptions and waivers from federal law—Conflict with federal requirements—Severability—1997 c 58: See RCW 74.08A.900 through 74.08A.904.